Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-3716
Penalties; distribution.

Any penalties collected pursuant to the Foreign-owned Real Estate National Security Act shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 2024, LB1301, § 19.